lexd_components/hyw-adjective_adverb_list.lexd
LEXICON AdjReg
լերդած:լերդած
ամպարիշտ:ամպարիշտ
բաժանելի:բաժանելի
զարթուցիչ:զարթուցիչ
իմն:իմն
հիմնարար:հիմնարար
ցեղասպան:ցեղասպան
կապեալ:կապեալ
նեղուածք:նեղուածք
ակնյայտ:ակնյայտ
փաստացի:փաստացի
որբեւարի:որբեւարի
պատկերաւոր:պատկերաւոր
պնդերես:պնդերես
վրանագործ:վրանագործ
բեհեզեղէն:բեհեզեղէն
բուժարար:բուժարար
գարեղէն:գարեղէն
դրուագազարդ:դրուագազարդ
իշխանազուն:իշխանազուն
ագագացի:ագագացի
ազովտացի:ազովտացի
անզիղջ:անզիղջ
դառնագին:դառնագին
երկերկու:երկերկու
հիմնայատակ:հիմնայատակ
աթենացի:աթենացի
աղեքսանդրացի:աղեքսանդրացի
ամաղեկացի:ամաղեկացի
ամմոնացի:ամմոնացի
ամօրհացի:ամօրհացի
անաթովթացի:անաթովթացի
աստարովթացի:աստարովթացի
ասօնացի:ասօնացի
արաբաթացի:արաբաթացի
արաբացի:արաբացի
արարացի:արարացի
արափաթացի:արափաթացի
արաքացի:արաքացի
արբացի:արբացի
արիմաթացի:արիմաթացի
արիսպագացի:արիսպագացի
արոէրացի:արոէրացի
արովրացի:արովրացի
արուկեցի:արուկեցի
ափարսաքացի:ափարսաքացի
աքուքացի:աքուքացի
բազկաթացի:բազկաթացի
բարումացի:բարումացի
բաւուրիմացի:բաւուրիմացի
բեթելացի:բեթելացի
բեթլեհեմացի:բեթլեհեմացի
բեթսամիւսացի:բեթսամիւսացի
բերիացի:բերիացի
բերովթացի:բերովթացի
բլրացի:բլրացի
բուզացի:բուզացի
բօսրացի:բօսրացի
գաբաացի:գաբաացի
գաբաւոնացի:գաբաւոնացի
գադարացի:գադարացի
գադացի:գադացի
գադերացի:գադերացի
գալիլիացի:գալիլիացի
գաղաադացի:գաղաադացի
գաղղիմացի:գաղղիմացի
գեդովրացի:գեդովրացի
գեթացի:գեթացի
գեթքոփերացի:գեթքոփերացի
գեղոնացի:գեղոնացի
գերգեսացի:գերգեսացի
գերսոնացի:գերսոնացի
դամասկոսցի:դամասկոսցի
դիոսկուրացի:դիոսկուրացի
եբրայեցի:եբրայեցի
եդովմայեցի:եդովմայեցի
եզրահացի:եզրահացի
ելկեսացի:ելկեսացի
ետեբացի:ետեբացի
երուսաղեմացի:երուսաղեմացի
երուսաղէմացի:երուսաղէմացի
եփեսացի:եփեսացի
եփրաթացի:եփրաթացի
զաբուղոնացի:զաբուղոնացի
զուզեցի:զուզեցի
թամնաթացի:թամնաթացի
թարգաթացի:թարգաթացի
թարսիսցի:թարսիսցի
թեզբացի:թեզբացի
թեկուացի:թեկուացի
թեմանացի:թեմանացի
թեսաղոնիկեցի:թեսաղոնիկեցի
թիսացի:թիսացի
իկոնացի:իկոնացի
իսկարիովտացի:իսկարիովտացի
իսմայելացի:իսմայելացի
իսրայէլացի:իսրայէլացի
լաբացի:լաբացի
լեբնացի:լեբնացի
լիբերտինացի:լիբերտինացի
լիւստրացի:լիւստրացի
խեւացի:խեւացի
կաբեսէելացի:կաբեսէելացի
կանանացի:կանանացի
կարմելացի:կարմելացի
կեդմոնացի:կեդմոնացի
կենեցի:կենեցի
կեսարացի:կեսարացի
կիւրենացի:կիւրենացի
կորխացի:կորխացի
հագարացի:հագարացի
հարօդացի:հարօդացի
հելլենացի:հելլենացի
մագդաղենացի:մագդաղենացի
մադիանացի:մադիանացի
մաթանացի:մաթանացի
մակեդոնացի:մակեդոնացի
մահաւացի:մահաւացի
մաուլացի:մաուլացի
մասարացի:մասարացի
մասրեկացի:մասրեկացի
մարեսացի:մարեսացի
մաքաթացի:մաքաթացի
մեսօբացի:մեսօբացի
մերոնոթացի:մերոնոթացի
մեքուրաթացի:մեքուրաթացի
մովաբացի:մովաբացի
մօրստացի:մօրստացի
յայիրացի:յայիրացի
յարուփացի:յարուփացի
յեբուսացի:յեբուսացի
յեզրայելացի:յեզրայելացի
յեզրացի:յեզրացի
յեթերացի:յեթերացի
նաամացի:նաամացի
նազովրեցի:նազովրեցի
նեհելամացի:նեհելամացի
նետոփաթացի:նետոփաթացի
նովացի:նովացի
ոդողոմացի:ոդողոմացի
ովսացի:ովսացի
որոնացի:որոնացի
ռումացի:ռումացի
սաղաբինացի:սաղաբինացի
սամարացի:սամարացի
սանամացի:սանամացի
սարաացի:սարաացի
սարօնացի:սարօնացի
սեմարացի:սեմարացի
սենացի:սենացի
սեփամացի:սեփամացի
սիդոնացի:սիդոնացի
սիլօնացի:սիլօնացի
սկիւթացի:սկիւթացի
սուբացի:սուբացի
սունամացի:սունամացի
սօքեցի:սօքեցի
տարսոնացի:տարսոնացի
տիւրացի:տիւրացի
փարաթոնացի:փարաթոնացի
փարիսեցի:փարիսեցի
փելլատացի:փելլատացի
փելօնացի:փելօնացի
փղշտացի:փղշտացի
փութացի:փութացի
քանանացի:քանանացի
քասղուքացի:քասղուքացի
քետացի:քետացի
քոռեցի:քոռեցի
քուբացի:քուբացի
բեթլէհեմացի:բեթլէհեմացի
բեթլէհէմացի:բեթլէհէմացի
ափարսաթաքացի:ափարսաթաքացի
ափերսացի:ափերսացի
բաբելոնացի:բաբելոնացի
գաղատացի:գաղատացի
եղամացի:եղամացի
շուշանացի:շուշանացի
ասորացի:ասորացի
դեդանացի:դեդանացի
լիւրիկացի:լիւրիկացի
կիտացի:կիտացի
յերամելացի:յերամելացի
սինէացի:սինէացի
կորնթացի:կորնթացի
սողոմացի:սողոմացի
ամաթացի:ամաթացի
ասենացի:ասենացի
արուադացի:արուադացի
դերբացի:դերբացի
թահքեմոնացի:թահքեմոնացի
մագդաղինացի:մագդաղինացի
սողոմացիի:սողոմացիի
փերեզացի:փերեզացի
կողոսացի:կողոսացի
կորնթացի:կորնթացի
ակկարոնացի:ակկարոնացի
անամացի:անամացի
աւացի:աւացի
բաբելացի:բաբելացի
գեբաղացի:գեբաղացի
դամադացի:դամադացի
եմաթացի:եմաթացի
եսթաւուղացի:եսթաւուղացի
զիփացի:զիփացի
լիբէացի:լիբէացի
կահաթացի:կահաթացի
կափթորացի:կափթորացի
կենեզացի:կենեզացի
ղաբացի:ղաբացի
ղուդացի:ղուդացի
մաոնացի:մաոնացի
նետոբաթացի:նետոբաթացի
նեփթուքացի:նեփթուքացի
նինուէացի:նինուէացի
պաթուրեսացի:պաթուրեսացի
սամաթացի:սամաթացի
սեփարուիմացի:սեփարուիմացի
սովկաթացի:սովկաթացի
փուդացի:փուդացի
քութացի:քութացի
գեսուրացի:գեսուրացի
կիտացի:կիտացի
պաթուրեսացի:պաթուրեսացի
սարացի:սարացի
սովկիացի:սովկիացի
աբիլինացի:աբիլինացի
ազատացի:ազատացի
ասկաղոնացի:ասկաղոնացի
բերացի:բերացի
գազացի:գազացի
գազերացի:գազերացի
գոմորացի:գոմորացի
իտուրացի:իտուրացի
լիկայոնացի:լիկայոնացի
մանաքաթացի:մանաքաթացի
մեմփացի:մեմփացի
յետուրացի:յետուրացի
նափեսացի:նափեսացի
նոդաբացի:նոդաբացի
սիւքեմացի:սիւքեմացի
սուրիացի:սուրիացի
տափնացի:տափնացի
տրաքոնացի:տրաքոնացի
խուզարկ:խուզարկ
խուզարկ:խուզարկ
ռամկօրէն:ռամկօրէն
ծաղկաքաղ:ծաղկաքաղ
ծնող:ծնող
կենդանի:կենդանի
կղերական:կղերական
կոյս:կոյս
հակամաղձային:հակամաղձային
հականեխական:հականեխական
հողմահար:հողմահար
ձիական:ձիական
մագլցող:մագլցող
մանրակտիտ:մանրակտիտ
մանրակրկիտ:մանրակրկիտ
մաքրիչ:մաքրիչ
մեղրակեր:մեղրակեր
միօրեայ:միօրեայ
մնացորդ:մնացորդ
ուղղագիր:ուղղագիր
ուղղիչ:ուղղիչ
ունակ:ունակ
չորրորդ:չորրորդ
պահպանիչ:պահպանիչ
պահպանող:պահպանող
պաշտպանողական:պաշտպանողական
ջեռուցիչ:ջեռուցիչ
սահմանական:սահմանական
սգազգեստ:սգազգեստ
սիր:սիր
սուտ:սուտ
տեսող:տեսող
ցատքող:ցատքող
ագատ:ագատ
ագուցիչ:ագուցիչ
ազատազգի:ազատազգի
ազատասպան:ազատասպան
ազնուական:ազնուական
աթաբէկ:աթաբէկ
աժան:աժան
ալեւոր:ալեւոր
ածանց:ածանց
ակնհար:ակնհար
աղածին:աղածին
աղակերպ:աղակերպ
աղաչող:աղաչող
աղարտիչ:աղարտիչ
աղեղնադրօշ:աղեղնադրօշ
աղէկ:աղէկ
աղմկարար:աղմկարար
աղքատիկ:աղքատիկ
ամբոխավար:ամբոխավար
ամբոխարար:ամբոխարար
ամուսնացած:ամուսնացած
ամուսնացեալ:ամուսնացեալ
ամսական:ամսական
ամրապահակ:ամրապահակ
այժմէական:այժմէական
այլատամ:այլատամ
այսաբնակ:այսաբնակ
այսակիր:այսակիր
այսահար:այսահար
այսօրածին:այսօրածին
անամուսին:անամուսին
անարի:անարի
անարիական:անարիական
անբան:անբան
անդամալոյծ:անդամալոյծ
անդամախեղ:անդամախեղ
անդոյր:անդոյր
անդորր:անդորր
անել:անել
անելանելի:անելանելի
անընդհատ:անընդհատ
անծանօթ:անծանօթ
անկարող:անկարող
անկիզական:անկիզական
անհանգիստ:անհանգիստ
անհաւատ:անհաւատ
անմեղանչական:անմեղանչական
անուանակապ:անուանակապ
աշխարհաբնակ:աշխարհաբնակ
աշխարհակալ:աշխարհակալ
աշխարհական:աշխարհական
ապաժոյժ:ապաժոյժ
ապականիչ:ապականիչ
ապականող:ապականող
ապաշնորհ:ապաշնորհ
ապառաժ:ապառաժ
ապառիկ:ապառիկ
ապերախտ:ապերախտ
ապուշ:ապուշ
առնազէն:առնազէն
առջինեկ:առջինեկ
ասիական:ասիական
աստանդական:աստանդական
աստղահմայ:աստղահմայ
աստղաձեւ:աստղաձեւ
աստուածառաք:աստուածառաք
արամազնեայ:արամազնեայ
արբշիռ:արբշիռ
արեւելցի:արեւելցի
արեւելքցի:արեւելքցի
արիւնագոյն:արիւնագոյն
արիւներանգ:արիւներանգ
արծաթեղէն:արծաթեղէն
արկած:արկած
արուէգ:արուէգ
աւագ:աւագ
աւարառու:աւարառու
աւելորդ:աւելորդ
աւետարանական:աւետարանական
բազմաբարբառ:բազմաբարբառ
բազմաբերան:բազմաբերան
բազմագիր:բազմագիր
բազմապատիկ:բազմապատիկ
բազմոտանի:բազմոտանի
բաժանարար:բաժանարար
բաժանիչ:բաժանիչ
բաժանող:բաժանող
բաժանորդ:բաժանորդ
բաժանորդագին:բաժանորդագին
բաժնող:բաժնող
բանադրեալ:բանադրեալ
բանադրուած:բանադրուած
բանապաշտ:բանապաշտ
բանդագուշող:բանդագուշող
բանող:բանող
բանջարեղէն:բանջարեղէն
բանտակալ:բանտակալ
բանտական:բանտական
բանտամուտ:բանտամուտ
բաշխիչ:բաշխիչ
բաշխող:բաշխող
բարբարոս:բարբարոս
բարեգործ:բարեգործ
բարեշրջական:բարեշրջական
բարոյական:բարոյական
բարուական:բարուական
բիրտ:բիրտ
բծախնդիր:բծախնդիր
բծկան:բծկան
բնակ:բնակ
բնակից:բնակից
բնատիպ:բնատիպ
բոլորածիր:բոլորածիր
բռնակալ:բռնակալ
գաղղիացի:գաղղիացի
գառնենի:գառնենի
գար:գար
գարշաբան:գարշաբան
գինեմոլ:գինեմոլ
գիսաւոր:գիսաւոր
գիտնական:գիտնական
գոյ:գոյ
գովաբանական:գովաբանական
գովասանական:գովասանական
գովիչ:գովիչ
գովող:գովող
գործադիր:գործադիր
գործաթող:գործաթող
գործօն:գործօն
գուժաբեր:գուժաբեր
գրաւող:գրաւող
դաշնադիր:դաշնադիր
դաշնակից:դաշնակից
դաշտանաբեր:դաշտանաբեր
դաշտանահոս:դաշտանահոս
դատարկակեաց:դատարկակեաց
դատափետ:դատափետ
դաւագործ:դաւագործ
դաւաճան:դաւաճան
դեղեխ:դեղեխ
դեր:դեր
դժնեայ:դժնեայ
դիւրագին:դիւրագին
դիւրագնի:դիւրագնի
դմբոյ:դմբոյ
եզակ:եզակ
եզակի:եզակի
եկակոչ:եկակոչ
եկեղեցական:եկեղեցական
եղերերգու:եղերերգու
եղծ:եղծ
ենթաթթու:ենթաթթու
եռաթիւ:եռաթիւ
եռակարգեան:եռակարգեան
եռապատեան:եռապատեան
եռավանկ:եռավանկ
եռափեղկ:եռափեղկ
եռոտանի:եռոտանի
երազատես:երազատես
երգիծաբան:երգիծաբան
երգիծախօս:երգիծախօս
երդմնազանց:երդմնազանց
երդմնախոր:երդմնախոր
երդմնակեր:երդմնակեր
երդմնուրաց:երդմնուրաց
երեքպատիկ:երեքպատիկ
երէզ:երէզ
երիցագոյն:երիցագոյն
երկակշիռ:երկակշիռ
երկայնածնօտ:երկայնածնօտ
երկանուն:երկանուն
երկար:երկար
երկարաձգող:երկարաձգող
երկբերան:երկբերան
երկբերանեան:երկբերանեան
երկլեզուագէտ:երկլեզուագէտ
երկհարիւրամեայ:երկհարիւրամեայ
երկհոլով:երկհոլով
երկոտասաներորդ:երկոտասաներորդ
երկուորեակ:երկուորեակ
երկոքեան:երկոքեան
երկոքին:երկոքին
երկտեսակ:երկտեսակ
երկրակալ:երկրակալ
երրեակ:երրեակ
երրորդութենական:երրորդութենական
եւրոպացի:եւրոպացի
եօթնեակ:եօթնեակ
զազրաբան:զազրաբան
զազրախօս:զազրախօս
զառիվայր:զառիվայր
զառիվեր:զառիվեր
զարկուած:զարկուած
զետեղ:զետեղ
զինուորական:զինուորական
զլացող:զլացող
զննիչ:զննիչ
զոյգ:զոյգ
զուարճարար:զուարճարար
զուգախիտ:զուգախիտ
զուգակից:զուգակից
զտիչ:զտիչ
զտող:զտող
զրահանաւ:զրահանաւ
զրահաւոր:զրահաւոր
զրապաշտ:զրապաշտ
զրապարիշտ:զրապարիշտ
զրեհիկ:զրեհիկ
զրպարտիչ:զրպարտիչ
զրպարտող:զրպարտող
ըմբռնիչ:ըմբռնիչ
ընդակից:ընդակից
ընդարձակիչ:ընդարձակիչ
ընդարձակող:ընդարձակող
ընդդիմադարձ:ընդդիմադարձ
ընդդիմամարտ:ընդդիմամարտ
ընդոծին:ընդոծին
ընծայական:ընծայական
ընտրելի:ընտրելի
թագաւորող:թագաւորող
թացիկ:թացիկ
թաքուստ:թաքուստ
թերահաւատ:թերահաւատ
թերթականջ:թերթականջ
թեւահերձ:թեւահերձ
թղթակազմ:թղթակազմ
թշնամանի:թշնամանի
թշուառական:թշուառական
թոթով:թոթով
թոշակաւոր:թոշակաւոր
թովմայեան:թովմայեան
թուական:թուական
թուակից:թուակից
թռան:թռան
թռչուն:թռչուն
ժամադիր:ժամադիր
ժանեկաձեւ:ժանեկաձեւ
ժխտող:ժխտող
իննանկիւն:իննանկիւն
իննանկիւնի:իննանկիւնի
ինքնագաւառացի:ինքնագաւառացի
ինքնագիր:ինքնագիր
ինքնաշարժ:ինքնաշարժ
ինքնատիպ:ինքնատիպ
իշխեցող:իշխեցող
իշխող:իշխող
լալական:լալական
լալի:լալի
լալկան:լալկան
լայնափողոց:լայնափողոց
լատին:լատին
լացող:լացող
լեառնական:լեառնական
լեգէոնական:լեգէոնական
լենինական:լենինական
լեռնակեաց:լեռնակեաց
լեռնակեցիկ:լեռնակեցիկ
լծորդ:լծորդ
լնդագար:լնդագար
լուծեալ:լուծեալ
լուծողական:լուծողական
լուծուած:լուծուած
լուսաբանող:լուսաբանող
լուսաբնակ:լուսաբնակ
լուսակերպ:լուսակերպ
լուսակիր:լուսակիր
լուսաւորեալ:լուսաւորեալ
լուսաւորիչ:լուսաւորիչ
լուսնաժէտ:լուսնաժէտ
լուսնահար:լուսնահար
լուսնամէջ:լուսնամէջ
լսնամորթ:լսնամորթ
լսող:լսող
խաբեբայ:խաբեբայ
խածանող:խածանող
խաղամոլ:խաղամոլ
խաշմ:խաշմ
խաչագող:խաչագող
խաչակիր:խաչակիր
խառնագնաց:խառնագնաց
խառնածին:խառնածին
խառնածնունդ:խառնածնունդ
խարկեայք:խարկեայք
խաւար:խաւար
խաւարտք:խաւարտք
խենդ:խենդ
խենթ:խենթ
խեռ:խեռ
խեցապատեան:խեցապատեան
խեցեմորթ:խեցեմորթ
խմող:խմող
խնդրակ:խնդրակ
խնդրող:խնդրող
խոզախտաւոր:խոզախտաւոր
խոժոռ:խոժոռ
խոկ:խոկ
խոտակեր:խոտակեր
խորայոյզ:խորայոյզ
խորանազարդ:խորանազարդ
խորանակապ:խորանակապ
խորհող:խորհող
խորհրդատու:խորհրդատու
խորհրդարանական:խորհրդարանական
խուլ:խուլ
խպիպաւոր:խպիպաւոր
խռովիչ:խռովիչ
խրախճանակից:խրախճանակից
խցարգել:խցարգել
խօլ:խօլ
խօսող:խօսող
ծախիչ:ծախիչ
ծաղկաբեր:ծաղկաբեր
ծաղրածու:ծաղրածու
ծաղրակատակ:ծաղրակատակ
ծայրանուն:ծայրանուն
ծանծաղամիտ:ծանծաղամիտ
ծանօթ:ծանօթ
ծառուտ:ծառուտ
ծասքողական:ծասքողական
ծիծաղող:ծիծաղող
ծխող:ծխող
ծնկակապ:ծնկակապ
ծովագնաց:ծովագնաց
կագազարթոյց:կագազարթոյց
կազմակերպիչ:կազմակերպիչ
կազմիչ:կազմիչ
կազմող:կազմող
կաթուածահար:կաթուածահար
կալանաւոր:կալանաւոր
կալաքարաձեւ:կալաքարաձեւ
կալուինական:կալուինական
կախարդիչ:կախարդիչ
կակազ:կակազ
կակղաթեւ:կակղաթեւ
կաղ:կաղ
կամարակապ:կամարակապ
կամարաւոր:կամարաւոր
կամաւոր:կամաւոր
կայլակահոս:կայլակահոս
կայծքարուտ:կայծքարուտ
կանանչ:կանանչ
կանաչ:կանաչ
կանխագէտ:կանխագէտ
կանխերգ:կանխերգ
կանոնաւորիչ:կանոնաւորիչ
կանոնաւորող:կանոնաւորող
կատակերգ:կատակերգ
կատակերգակ:կատակերգակ
կարգաւոր:կարգաւոր
կարգաւորեալ:կարգաւորեալ
կարօտ:կարօտ
կեղեքիչ:կեղեքիչ
կեղծաւոր:կեղծաւոր
կեղծող:կեղծող
կենդանակերպ:կենդանակերպ
կերող:կերող
կէս:կէս
կիլիկեան:կիլիկեան
կիլիկեցի:կիլիկեցի
կիսաբոլոր:կիսաբոլոր
կիսամասն:կիսամասն
կծծի:կծծի
կծոխոր:կծոխոր
կղզեցի:կղզեցի
կշտամբիչ:կշտամբիչ
կոխիչ:կոխիչ
կոկոզաբան:կոկոզաբան
կողմնակից:կողմնակից
կոճկէն:կոճկէն
կոչնական:կոչնական
կոտորիչ:կոտորիչ
կոտորող:կոտորող
կոտրող:կոտրող
կոտրտուող:կոտրտուող
կործանիչ:կործանիչ
կորճատամ:կորճատամ
կուռ:կուռ
կուսան:կուսան
կռուակից:կռուակից
կտրած:կտրած
կրաշաղախ:կրաշաղախ
կրկտաքաղ:կրկտաքաղ
կրող:կրող
կրօնաւոր:կրօնաւոր
կցորդ:կցորդ
հալածիչ:հալածիչ
հակագրգիռ:հակագրգիռ
հակագրգռիչ:հակագրգռիչ
հակադարձ:հակադարձ
հակադրող:հակադրող
հակաժահրային:հակաժահրային
հակախոյլ:հակախոյլ
հակակատաղական:հակակատաղական
